West Virginia, session 2026, HB5053.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 8. COMPULSORY SCHOOL ATTENDANCE. §18-8-13. Time limit established for active truancy or pre-petition process. (a) Legislative findings. – (1) Upon reaching the pre-petition stage, a county often receives a homeschool notice. This constitutes an "easy out," resulting in the loss of critical oversight for at-risk youth. For this reason, there should be specific safeguards in the code to protect student well-being during truancy proceedings.(2) Additionally, there is concern that families may use a homeschool over-the-summer credit to bypass the required reading proficiency standards and retention provisions of the Third Grade Success Act. For this reason, there should be a prevention on the use of short-term homeschooling as a means to circumvent academic accountability measures.(b) Enactment. – There is established a 90-day time limit during which a family involved in an active truancy or pre-petition process cannot petition to withdraw the student for homeschooling. Additionally, the West Virginia Department of Education is encouraged to undergo a comprehensive survey of public-school families who choose to homeschool to identify systemic drivers for the decision.